Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.092

Involuntary medication—Serious offenses.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) For purposes of determining whether a court may authorize involuntary medication for the purpose of competency restoration pursuant to RCW 10.77.084 and for maintaining the level of restoration in the jail following the restoration period, a pending charge involving any one or more of the following crimes is a serious offense per se in the context of competency restoration:

(a) Any violent offense, sex offense, serious traffic offense, and most serious offense, as those terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Any offense, except nonfelony counterfeiting offenses, included in crimes against persons in RCW 9.94A.411;

(c) Any offense contained in chapter 9.41 RCW (firearms and dangerous weapons);

(d) Any offense listed as domestic violence in RCW 10.99.020;

(e) Any offense listed as a harassment offense in chapter 9A.46 RCW, except for criminal trespass in the first or second degree;

(f) Any violation of chapter 69.50 RCW that is a class B felony; or

(g) Any city or county ordinance or statute that is equivalent to an offense referenced in this subsection.

(2) Any time a petition is filed seeking a court order authorizing the involuntary medication for purposes of competency restoration pursuant to RCW 10.77.084, the petition must also seek authorization to continue involuntary medication for purposes of maintaining the level of restoration in the jail or juvenile detention facility following the restoration period.

(3)(a) In a particular case, a court may determine that a pending charge not otherwise defined as serious by state or federal law or by a city or county ordinance is, nevertheless, a serious offense within the context of competency restoration treatment when the conduct in the charged offense falls within the standards established in (b) of this subsection.

(b) To determine that the particular case is a serious offense within the context of competency restoration, the court must consider the following factors and determine that one or more of the following factors creates a situation in which the offense is serious:

(i) The charge includes an allegation that the defendant actually inflicted bodily or emotional harm on another person or that the defendant created a reasonable apprehension of bodily or emotional harm to another;

(ii) The extent of the impact of the alleged offense on the basic human need for security of the citizens within the jurisdiction;

(iii) The number and nature of related charges pending against the defendant;

(iv) The length of potential confinement if the defendant is convicted; and

(v) The number of potential and actual victims or persons impacted by the defendant's alleged acts.

[ 2023 c 453 s 11; 2014 c 10 s 2; 2008 c 213 s 2; 2004 c 157 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.

Finding—2014 c 10: "The legislature finds that there is currently no clear language authorizing courts to order involuntary medications in order to maintain the level of competency restoration in the jail following a competency restoration period and subsequent discharge from a state hospital. This act specifies that maintenance of competency in jail is a purpose for which the court may order a criminal defendant facing serious charges to be involuntarily medicated." [ 2014 c 10 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2004 c 157: See notes following RCW 10.77.010.